test/src/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - duovdagadilli: # SEAMU SgGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [duovdagadilli, duovdaga-dilli,duovdatdilli, duovdat-dilli]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen: [duovdagadili, duovdaga-dili, duovdatdili, duovdat-dili]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [duovdagadilláme, duovdaga-dilláme, duovdatdilláme, duovdat-dilláme]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc: [duovdagadili, duovdaga-dili, duovdatdili, duovdat-dili]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [duovdagadilis, duovdaga-dilis, duovdat-dilis, duovdatdilis]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [duovdagadillái, duovdaga-dillái, duovdatdillái, duovdat-dillái]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com: [duovdagadiliin, duovdaga-diliin, duovdat-diliin, duovdatdiliin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom: [duovdagadilit, duovdaga-dilit, duovdatdilit, duovdat-dilit]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen: [duovdagadiliid, duovdaga-diliid, duovdatdiliid, duovdat-diliid]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc: [duovdagadiliid, duovdaga-diliid, duovdat-diliid, duovdatdiliid]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc: [duovdagadiliin, duovdaga-diliin, duovdat-diliin, duovdatdiliin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill: [duovdagadiliide, duovdaga-diliide, duovdatdiliide, duovdat-diliide]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com: [duovdagadiliiguin, duovdaga-diliiguin, duovdat-diliiguin, duovdatdiliiguin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess: [duovdagadillin, duovdaga-dillin, duovdat-dillin, duovdatdillin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [duovdagadiláš, duovdaga-diláš, duovdat-diláš, duovdatdiláš]

  Noun - duovdagiiddilli: # SEAMU PlGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [duovdagiiddilli, duovdagiid-dilli]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen: [duovdagiiddili, duovdagiid-dili]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [duovdagiiddilláme, duovdagiid-dilláme]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc: [duovdagiiddili, duovdagiid-dili]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [duovdagiiddilis, duovdagiid-dilis]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [duovdagiiddillái, duovdagiid-dillái]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com: [duovdagiiddiliin, duovdagiid-diliin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom: [duovdagiiddilit, duovdagiid-dilit]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen: [duovdagiiddiliid, duovdagiid-diliid]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc: [duovdagiiddiliid, duovdagiid-diliid]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc: [duovdagiiddiliin, duovdagiid-diliin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill: [duovdagiiddiliide, duovdagiid-diliide]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com: [duovdagiiddiliiguin, duovdagiid-diliiguin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess: [duovdagiiddillin, duovdagiid-dillin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [duovdagiiddiláš, duovdagiid-diláš]

  Noun - olmmošjuolgi: # FALIS SgNomCmp + AIGI
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Nom: [olmmošjuolgi, olmmoš-juolgi]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Pl+Nom: [olmmošjuolggit, olmmoš-juolggit]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Ill: [olmmošjuolgái, olmmoš-juolgái]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [olmmošjuolggáš, olmmoš-juolggáš]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [olmmošjuolggážaš, olmmoš-juolggážaš]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [olmmošjuolggeheapme, olmmoš-juolggeheapme]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [olmmošjuolggálaš, olmmoš-juolggálaš]

  Noun - olbmojuolgi: # FALIS SgGenCmp + AIGI
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Nom: [olbmojuolgi, olbmo-juolgi]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Pl+Nom: [olbmojuolggit, olbmo-juolggit]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Ill: [olbmojuolgái, olbmo-juolgái]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [olbmojuolggáš, olbmo-juolggáš]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [olbmojuolggážaš, olbmo-juolggážaš]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [olbmojuolggeheapme, olbmo-juolggeheapme]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [olbmojuolggálaš, olbmo-juolggálaš]

  Noun - olbmuidjuolgi: # FALIS PlGenCmp + AIGI
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Nom: [olbmuidjuolgi, olbmuid-juolgi]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Pl+Nom: [olbmuidjuolggit, olbmuid-juolggit]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Sg+Ill: [olbmuidjuolgái, olbmuid-juolgái]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [olbmuidjuolggáš, olbmuid-juolggáš]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [olbmuidjuolggážaš, olbmuid-juolggážaš]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [olbmuidjuolggeheapme, olbmuid-juolggeheapme]
    olmmoš+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#juolgi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [olbmuidjuolggálaš, olbmuid-juolggálaš]

  Noun - muitomuittašeapmi: # AIGI SgNomCmp +  EAPMI
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Nom: [muitomuittašeapmi, muito-muittašeapmi]
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Loc: [muitomuittašeames, muitomuittašeamis, muito-muittašeames, muito-muittašeamis]
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Ill: [muitomuittašeapmái, muito-muittašeapmái]

  Noun - muittomuittašeapmi: # AIGI SgGenCmp +  EAPMI
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Nom: [muittomuittašeapmi, muitto-muittašeapmi]
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Loc: [muittomuittašeames, muittomuittašeamis, muitto-muittašeames, muitto-muittašeamis]
    muitu+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Ill: [muittomuittašeapmái, muitto-muittašeapmái]

  Noun - muittuidmuittašeapmi: # AIGI PlGenCmp +  EAPMI
    muitu+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Nom: [muittuidmuittašeapmi, muittuid-muittašeapmi]
    muitu+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Loc: [muittuidmuittašeames, muittuidmuittašeamis, muittuid-muittašeames, muittuid-muittašeamis]
    muitu+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#muittašeapmi+N+Sg+Ill: [muittuidmuittašeapmái, muittuid-muittašeapmái]

  Noun - muittašaneaiggát: # EAPMI SgCmp + GAHPIRLONG
    muittašeapmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#eaiggát+N+Sg+Nom: [muittašaneaiggát, muittašan-eaiggát]
    muittašeapmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#eaiggát+N+Sg+Loc: [muittašaneaiggádis, muittašan-eaiggádis]
    muittašeapmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#eaiggát+N+Sg+Ill: [muittašaneaiggádii, muittašan-eaiggádii]
    muittašeapmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#eaiggát+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [muittašaneaiggátlaš, muittašan-eaiggátlaš]

  Noun - oarregávpi: # ALBMI SgNomCmp + GOAHTI-I
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Sg+Nom: [oarregávpi, oarre-gávpi]
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Pl+Nom: [oarregávppit, oarre-gávppit]
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Sg+Ill: [oarregávpái, oarre-gávpái]
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [oarregávppáš, oarre-gávppáš]
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [oarregávppážaš, oarre-gávppážaš]
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [oarregávppeheapme, oarre-gávppeheapme, oarregávppiheapme, oarre-gávppiheapme]
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [oarregávppálaš, oarre-gávppálaš]


  Noun - orriidgávpi: # ALBMI PlGenCmp + GOAHTI-I
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Sg+Nom: [orriidgávpi, orriid-gávpi]
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Pl+Nom: [orriidgávppit, orriid-gávppit]
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Sg+Ill: [orriidgávpái, orriid-gávpái]
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [orriidgávppáš, orriid-gávppáš]
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [orriidgávppážaš, orriid-gávppážaš]
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [orriidgávppeheapme, orriid-gávppeheapme, orriidgávppiheapme, orriid-gávppiheapme]
    oarri+G7+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gávpi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [orriidgávppálaš, orriid-gávppálaš]

  Noun - juhkkisearvi: # ACTORTVder SgNomCmp + GOAHTI-I
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkisearvi, juhkki-searvi]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Pl+Nom: [juhkkisearvvit, juhkki-searvvit]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Ill: [juhkkisearvái, juhkki-searvái]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkisearvváš, juhkki-searvváš]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkisearvvážaš, juhkki-searvvážaš]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [juhkkisearvveheapme, juhkki-searvveheapme, juhkkisearvviheapme, juhkki-searvviheapme]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [juhkkisearvválaš, juhkki-searvválaš]

  Noun - juhkkiidsearvi: # ACTORTVder PlGenCmp + GOAHTI-I
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkiidsearvi, juhkkiid-searvi]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Pl+Nom: [juhkkiidsearvvit, juhkkiid-searvvit]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Ill: [juhkkiidsearvái, juhkkiid-searvái]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkiidsearvváš, juhkkiid-searvváš]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkiidsearvvážaš, juhkkiid-searvvážaš]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [juhkkiidsearvveheapme, juhkkiid-searvveheapme, juhkkiid-searvviheapme, juhkkiidsearvviheapme]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [juhkkiidsearvválaš, juhkkiid-searvválaš]

  Noun - agibeaiávssis: # FirstComponent + LASIS
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Sg+Nom: [agibeaiávssis, agibeai-ávssis]
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Pl+Nom: [agibeaiáksát, agibeai-áksát]
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Sg+Ill: [agibeaiáksái, agibeai-áksái]
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [agibeaiáksáš, agibeai-áksáš]
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [agibeaiáksážaš, agibeai-áksážaš]
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [agibeaiávssesheapme, agibeai-ávssesheapme]



  Noun - kantuvradieđáhus: # KANTUR SgNomCmp + JOHTOLAT
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Nom: [konttordieđáhus, kontordieđáhus, gánttordieđáhus, gántordieđáhus, kontuvradieđáhus, kantuvradieđáhus, kánttordieđáhus, kánturdieđáhus, kántordieđáhus, gánturdieđáhus, gántuvradieđáhus, konttor-dieđáhus, kontor-dieđáhus, gánttor-dieđáhus, gántor-dieđáhus, kontuvra-dieđáhus, kantuvra-dieđáhus, kánttor-dieđáhus, kántur-dieđáhus, kántor-dieđáhus, gántur-dieđáhus, gántuvra-dieđáhus]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Loc: [konttordieđáhusas, kontordieđáhusas, gánttordieđáhusas, gántordieđáhusas, kontuvradieđáhusas, kantuvradieđáhusas, kánttordieđáhusas, kánturdieđáhusas, kántordieđáhusas, gánturdieđáhusas, gántuvradieđáhusas, konttor-dieđáhusas, kontor-dieđáhusas, gánttor-dieđáhusas, gántor-dieđáhusas, kontuvra-dieđáhusas, kantuvra-dieđáhusas, kánttor-dieđáhusas, kántur-dieđáhusas, kántor-dieđáhusas, gántur-dieđáhusas, gántuvra-dieđáhusas]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Ill: [konttordieđáhussii, kontordieđáhussii, gánttordieđáhussii, gántordieđáhussii, kontuvradieđáhussii, kantuvradieđáhussii, kánttordieđáhussii, kánturdieđáhussii, kántordieđáhussii, gánturdieđáhussii, gántuvradieđáhussii, konttor-dieđáhussii, kontor-dieđáhussii, gánttor-dieđáhussii, gántor-dieđáhussii, kontuvra-dieđáhussii, kantuvra-dieđáhussii, kánttor-dieđáhussii, kántur-dieđáhussii, kántor-dieđáhussii, gántur-dieđáhussii, gántuvra-dieđáhussii]
